Utah statutes.
63C-12-105.   Compensation of members -- Expenses.
A member of the council may not receive compensation or benefits for the
member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance
with:
(1)  Section 63A-3-106;
(2)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(3)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
